Washington statutes.
RCW 44.05.080

Duties. (Effective until January 1, 2026.)

In addition to other duties prescribed by law, the commission shall:

(1) Adopt rules pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW, to carry out the provisions of Article II, section 43 of the state Constitution and of this chapter, which rules shall provide that three voting members of the commission constitute a quorum to do business, and that the votes of three of the voting members are required for any official action of the commission;

(2) Act as the legislature's recipient of the final redistricting data and maps from the United States Bureau of the Census;

(3) Comply with requirements to disclose and preserve public records as specified in chapters 40.14 and 42.56 RCW;

(4) Hold open meetings pursuant to the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW;

(5) Prepare and disclose its minutes pursuant to RCW 42.30.035;

(6) Be subject to the provisions of RCW 42.17A.700;

(7) Prepare and publish a report with the plan; the report will be made available to the public at the time the plan is published. The report will include but will not be limited to: (a) The population and percentage deviation from the average district population for every district; (b) an explanation of the criteria used in developing the plan with a justification of any deviation in a district from the average district population; (c) a map of all the districts; and (d) the estimated cost incurred by the counties for adjusting precinct boundaries;

(8) Adopt a districting plan for a noncharter county with a population of four hundred thousand or more, pursuant to RCW 36.32.054.

[ 2018 c 301 s 10; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 25 s 33; 2011 c 60 s 42; 2005 c 274 s 303; 1983 c 16 s 8.]

NOTES:

Findings—Short title—2018 c 301: See notes following RCW 36.32.051.

Effective date—2011 c 60: See RCW 42.17A.919.

PDFRCW 44.05.080

Duties. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

In addition to other duties prescribed by law, the commission shall:

(1) Adopt rules pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW, to carry out the provisions of Article II, section 43 of the state Constitution and of this chapter, which rules shall provide that three voting members of the commission constitute a quorum to do business, and that the votes of three of the voting members are required for any official action of the commission;

(2) Act as the legislature's recipient of the final redistricting data and maps from the United States Bureau of the Census;

(3) Comply with requirements to disclose and preserve public records as specified in chapters 40.14 and 42.56 RCW;

(4) Hold open meetings pursuant to the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW;

(5) Prepare and disclose its minutes pursuant to RCW 42.30.035;

(6) Be subject to the provisions of RCW 29B.55.010;

(7) Prepare and publish a report with the plan; the report will be made available to the public at the time the plan is published. The report will include but will not be limited to: (a) The population and percentage deviation from the average district population for every district; (b) an explanation of the criteria used in developing the plan with a justification of any deviation in a district from the average district population; (c) a map of all the districts; and (d) the estimated cost incurred by the counties for adjusting precinct boundaries;

(8) Adopt a districting plan for a noncharter county with a population of 400,000 or more, pursuant to RCW 36.32.054.

[ 2024 c 164 s 529; 2018 c 301 s 10; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 25 s 33; 2011 c 60 s 42; 2005 c 274 s 303; 1983 c 16 s 8.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Findings—Short title—2018 c 301: See notes following RCW 36.32.051.

Effective date—2011 c 60: See note following RCW 29B.20.030.